California, session 20252026, AB1566.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11165.2 of the Penal Code is amended to read:11165.2. As used in this article, “neglect” means the negligent treatment or the maltreatment of a child by a person responsible for the child’s welfare under circumstances indicating harm or threatened harm to the child’s health or welfare. The term includes both acts and omissions on the part of the responsible person.(a) (1) As used in this article, “severe neglect” means the negligent failure of a person having the care or custody of a child to protect the child from severe malnutrition or medically diagnosed nonorganic failure to thrive. “Severe neglect” also means if any person, having the care or custody of a child, willfully causes or permits serious illness or serious injury to the child, willfully causes or permits the death of the child, or causes the child to be placed at imminent risk of serious illness, serious injury, or death, including, but not limited to, the willful failure to provide adequate food, clothing, shelter, or medical care. fails to provide adequate food, clothing, shelter, or medical care to the child that causes or permits serious illness or serious injury to, or the death of, the child or causes or permits the child to be placed at imminent risk of serious illness, serious injury, or death.(2) The changes made by the act that added this paragraph are not intended to reduce the reporting of actual cases of severe neglect.(3) The changes made by the act that added this paragraph are not intended to prohibit a peace officer from reporting or to interfere with a peace officer’s ability to report cases of severe neglect.(b) As used in this article, “general neglect” means the negligent failure of a person having the care or custody of a child to provide adequate food, clothing, shelter, medical care, or supervision where no physical injury to the child has occurred but the child is at substantial risk of suffering serious physical harm or illness. “General neglect” does not include a parent’s economic disadvantage.For the purposes of this article, a child receiving treatment by spiritual means as provided in Section 16509.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or not receiving specified medical treatment for religious reasons, shall not for that reason alone be considered a neglected child. An informed and appropriate medical decision made by parent or guardian after consultation with a physician who has examined the minor does not constitute neglect.